Hawaii statutes.
§587A-34 Reinstatement of parental rights.
(a) A child who is subject to an active proceeding under this chapter, the
child's guardian ad litem, the child's attorney, if any, or the department, may
file a motion to reinstate the terminated parental rights of the child's
parents in a proceeding under this chapter, where the following circumstances
exist:

(1) The child has been in permanent custody for at
least twelve months; and

(2) The child is fourteen years of age or older.

(b) A motion to reinstate parental rights shall
be filed with the court and shall describe the factors supporting a
reinstatement of parental rights. The court shall order a preliminary hearing
to be held within ninety days and shall give prior notice to:

(1) The former parent whose rights are sought to be
reinstated;

(2) The child's guardian ad litem;

(3) The department; and

(4) The child's resource family.

(c) The motion shall be denied if the parent
whose rights are sought to be reinstated cannot be located.

(d) Within seven days before the preliminary
hearing on the motion, the department and the child's guardian ad litem shall
submit reports to the court that address:

(1) The material change in circumstances since the
termination of parental rights;

(2) The reasons parental rights were terminated and
the date of the termination order;

(3) A parent's willingness to resume contact with the
child and to have parental rights reinstated;

(4) The child's willingness to resume contact with
the parent and to have parental rights reinstated;

(5) A parent's willingness and ability to be involved
in the child's life and to accept physical custody of the child; and

(6) Other relevant information.

(e) At a preliminary hearing on the motion,
the court shall continue the prior award of permanent custody and may order a
trial home placement and a temporary reinstatement of parental rights upon
finding that:

(1) There has been a material change in
circumstances;

(2) A parent is willing to provide care for the
child;

(3) A parent is able to provide a safe family home or
the home can be made safe with the assistance of services; and

(4) A trial home placement is in the child's best
interests.

(f) If the court issues a temporary order of
reinstatement of parental rights:

(1) The child shall be conditionally placed in the
physical care of the parent for a period not to exceed six months;

(2) The department shall develop a permanent plan for
reunification and shall ensure that transition services are provided to the
family, as appropriate; and

(3) The court shall hold a hearing on the motion to
reinstate parental rights after the child has been placed with the parent for
six months.

(g) The department has the authority to assess
the trial home placement and to rescind the trial home placement according to
the child's best interests.

(h) At a final hearing on the motion to
reinstate parental rights, the court may issue a final order of reinstatement
of parental rights and terminate its jurisdiction if the trial home placement
has been successful. In making its final decision, the court shall determine
whether the moving party has proven by clear and convincing evidence that:

(1) Reinstatement of parental rights is in the best
interests of the child, taking into consideration:

(A) Whether a parent has remedied the
conditions that caused the termination of parental rights;

(B) The age and maturity of the child and the
child's ability to express a preference; and

(C) The likelihood of risk to the health,
safety, or welfare of the child;

(2) A parent is able to provide the child with a safe
family home;

(3) Both the parent and child consent to the
reinstatement of parental rights; and

(4) The permanent plan goals for the child have not
been and are not likely to be achieved.

(i) A proceeding to reinstate parental rights shall
be a separate action from the proceeding for the termination of parental
rights. The granting of the motion to reinstate parental rights shall not
affect the validity of the original termination order. [L 2010, c 135, pt of §1;
am L 2011, c 51, §8]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next